Mississippi, session 2026, SB3057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the support and maintenance of the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $    34,365,575.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $    18,508,182.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, One Million One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($1,150,000.00) shall be derived from the Education Enhancement Fund from funds deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4.  No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service provide programs in the emphasis areas of Agriculture, Family and Consumer Education, Natural Resources and Environment, 4-H, and Business and Community Development in each county. SECTION 6.  No part of the funds appropriated or authorized to be expended hereby shall be spent directly or indirectly for payment of attorneys' fees for the services of any attorney who was not employed by the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service pursuant to the express authorization of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning prior to performance of such legal services. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that if the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act are used directly or indirectly to match or otherwise secure any federal grants, research grants or donations, such special source funds not classified as current restricted funds shall be added and accounted for under Section 2 of this act.  Further, it is the intention of the Legislature that all such aforementioned special source funds be included in all reports and requests for the 2026 Regular Session of the Mississippi Legislature. SECTION 9.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2027 Performance Measures                                       Target Agriculture Published Information                                    300 Mass Media                                             4500 Number of Direct Educational Contacts                 270,000 Average Cost per Educational Contact                   13.46 Family & Consumer Education Published Information                                    150 Number of Direct Educational Contacts                 205,000 Average Cost per Educational Contact                    9.34 Business & Community Dev Number of Direct Educational Contacts                 88,000 Average Cost per Educational Contact                   20.28 4-H Youth Development Number of Direct Educational Contacts                 178,000 Average Cost per Educational Contact                   11.66 Natural Resources & Environment Published Information                                    150 Mass Media                                            6,000 Number of Total Contacts (Persons Across all Delivery Methods/Events)                    370,000 Average Cost per Educational Contact                   27.75 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2028. SECTION 10.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 12.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 13.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.